Washington statutes.
RCW 4.105.901

Construction.

This chapter must be broadly construed and applied to protect the exercise of the right of freedom of speech and of the press, the right to assemble and petition, and the right of association, guaranteed by the United States Constitution or the Washington state Constitution.

[ 2021 c 259 s 11.]